Texas statutes.
PARKS AND WILDLIFE CODE

TITLE 5. WILDLIFE AND PLANT CONSERVATION

SUBTITLE B. HUNTING AND FISHING

CHAPTER 67. NONGAME SPECIES

Sec. 67.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "nongame" means those species of vertebrate and invertebrate wildlife indigenous to Texas that are not classified as game animals, game birds, game fish, fur-bearing animals, endangered species, alligators, marine penaeid shrimp, or oysters.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 1, Sec. 63, eff. Sept. 1, 1985; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 863, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1256, Sec. 109, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 67.0011. EXEMPTION OF CRAYFISH. This chapter does not apply to crayfish, other than in public water.

Added by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 399, ch. 161, Sec. 4, eff. May 20, 1981.

Sec. 67.002. MANAGEMENT OF NONGAME SPECIES. (a) The department shall develop and administer management programs to insure the continued ability of nongame species of fish and wildlife to perpetuate themselves successfully.

(b) In managing nongame species of fish and wildlife, the department may:

(1) disseminate information pertaining to nongame species conservation, management, and values;

(2) conduct scientific investigation and survey of nongame species for better protection and conservation;

(3) propagate, distribute, protect, and restore nongame species;

(4) research and manage nongame species;

(5) develop habitats for nongame species; and

(6) acquire habitats for nongame species.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 1, Sec. 64, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 67.003. CONTINUING SCIENTIFIC INVESTIGATIONS. The department shall conduct ongoing investigations of nongame fish and wildlife to develop information on populations, distribution, habitat needs, limiting factors, and any other biological or ecological data to determine appropriate management and regulatory information.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975.

Sec. 67.004. ISSUANCE OF REGULATIONS. (a) The commission by regulation shall establish any limits on the taking, possession, propagation, transportation, importation, exportation, sale, or offering for sale of nongame fish or wildlife that the department considers necessary to manage the species.

(b) The regulations shall state the name of the species or subspecies, by common and scientific name, that the department determines to be in need of management under this chapter.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1256, Sec. 110, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 67.0041. REGULATIONS AND PERMITS. (a) The department may issue permits for the taking, possession, propagation, transportation, sale, importation, or exportation of a nongame species of fish or wildlife if necessary to properly manage that species.

(b) The department may charge a fee for a permit issued under this section. The fee shall be set by the commission.

Added by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 1, Sec. 65, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1256, Sec. 111, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 67.005. PENALTY. (a) A person who violates a regulation of the commission issued under this chapter commits an offense that is a Class C Parks and Wildlife Code misdemeanor.

(b) A person who violates a regulation of the commission issued under this chapter and who has been convicted on one previous occasion of a violation of a commission regulation under this chapter commits an offense that is a Class B Parks and Wildlife Code misdemeanor.

(c) A person who violates a regulation of the commission issued under this chapter and who has been convicted on two or more previous occasions of a violation of commission regulations under this chapter commits an offense that is a Class A Parks and Wildlife Code misdemeanor.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 3, Sec. 77, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.